Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.040

Teacher qualifications and requirements for licensure under the compact.

(1) Except as provided for active military members or eligible military spouses in RCW 28A.420.020(4), a teacher may only be eligible to receive a license under this compact where that teacher holds an unencumbered license in a member state.

(2) A teacher eligible to receive a license under this compact shall, unless otherwise provided for herein:

(a) Upon their application to receive a license under this compact, undergo a criminal background check in the receiving state in accordance with the laws and regulations of the receiving state;

(b) Comply with any applicable conditions of employment in the receiving state; and

(c) Provide the receiving state with information in addition to the information required for licensure for the purposes of determining compensation, if applicable.

[ 2024 c 317 s 5.]